Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.335

Nursery advisory committee—Members—Terms.

A nursery advisory committee is hereby established to advise the director in the administration of this chapter.

(1) The committee shall consist of not less than four members, representing the interests of licensed nursery dealers and the nursery industry, appointed by the director in consultation with the following persons: The president of (a) the Washington state floricultural association, (b) the Washington state bulb association, and (c) the Washington state nursery and landscape association; and the director or the director's designated appointee.

(2) The terms of the members of the committee shall be staggered and the members shall serve a term of three years and until their successors have been appointed.

In the event a committee member resigns, is disqualified, or vacates a position on the committee for any other reason, the vacancy shall be filled by the director under the provisions of this section governing appointments.

[ 2000 c 144 s 12; 1990 c 261 s 6; 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 s 6.]